Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-203
Bonds; state officers and employees;
Risk Manager; file list with Clerk of the Legislature.

The
Risk Manager shall, during each regular session of the Legislature, file electronically with the Clerk
of the Legislature a complete list of the officers and employees who are bonded
and the amount of each bond.

Laws 1945, c. 13, § 3, p. 113;

Laws 1955, c. 17, § 3, p. 89;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 15.